Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 52.3 Online Property Offenses

11-52.3-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Access” means to use, instruct, communicate with, store data in, retrieve or intercept data from, or otherwise utilize any services of a computer.

“Computer” means a device that accepts, processes, stores, retrieves or outputs data, and includes, but is not limited to, auxiliary storage and telecommunications devices connected to computers.

“Internet” means an interactive computer service or system or an information service, system, or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a computer server, and includes, but is not limited to, an information service, system, or access software provider that provides access to a network system commonly known as the Internet, or any comparable system or service and also includes, but is not limited to, a World Wide Web page, newsgroup, message board, mailing list, or chat area on any interactive computer service or system or other online service.

“Online” means the use of any electronic or wireless device to access the Internet.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 467, § 1.

11-52.3-2.
Online sale of stolen property.

A person commits the offense of online sale of stolen property when he or she uses or accesses the Internet with the intent of selling property gained through unlawful means.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 467, § 1.

11-52.3-3.
Online theft by deception.

A person commits the offense of online theft by deception when he or she uses the Internet to purchase or attempt to purchase property from a seller with a mode of payment that he or she knows is fictitious, stolen, or lacking the consent of the valid account holder.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 467, § 1.

11-52.3-4.
Online fencing.

A person commits the offense of online fencing when he or she sells stolen property using the Internet, knowing that the property was stolen. The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to a person who unknowingly purchases stolen property over the Internet.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 467, § 1.

11-52.3-5.
Penalties.

Any person convicted of any offense under §§

11-52.3-2

and

11-52.3-4

, if the value of the property is less than five hundred dollars ($500), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both. If the property has a value of five hundred dollars ($500) or more, the person shall be guilty of a felony, and shall be imprisoned for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 467, § 1.